test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-sukka_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:


  
   
  Noun - sukká: # á-stems
    sukká+N+Sg+Nom: sukká
    sukká+N+Sg+Gen: suhá
    sukká+N+Sg+Acc: suhá
    sukká+N+Sg+Ill: suukán
    sukká+N+Sg+Loc: suhháást
    sukká+N+Sg+Com: suhháin
    sukká+N+Sg+Abe: suháttáá
    sukká+N+Ess: sukkán
    sukká+N+Par: sukkád
    sukká+N+Pl+Nom: suháh
    sukká+N+Pl+Gen: suhái
    sukká+N+Pl+Acc: suhháid
    sukká+N+Pl+Ill: suhháid
    sukká+N+Pl+Loc: suhháin
    sukká+N+Pl+Com: suháiguin
    sukká+N+Pl+Abe: suháittáá
